Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 1. Declaration of Rights
§ 20. Freedom of speech and press; libel; truth a defense.

Every person may freely speak, write and publish on all subjects, being responsible for the abuse of that right; and in all trials for libel, both civil and criminal, the truth, when published with good intent and [for] justifiable ends, shall be a sufficient defense, the jury having the right to determine the facts and the law, under direction of the court.

Cross references. —

As to libel and slander generally, see §§

1-3-105

,

1-4-102

,

1-29-101

to

1-29-106

.

For provision that article defining and punishing unlawful conduct within governmental facilities does not abridge freedom of speech and press, see §

6-6-304

.

Section compared to federal constitution. —

This section is broader than that found in the First Amendment to the United States constitution in that it also guarantees the right to publish which includes the right not only to speak and to write but also to make the same known. Tate v. Akers, 409 F. Supp. 978, 1976 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16485 (D. Wyo. 1976), aff'd, 565 F.2d 1166, 1977 U.S. App. LEXIS 5928 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1977).

Vagueness.

Provisions of the Wyoming Code of Judicial Conduct alleged to have been violated by a judge's refusal to marry same -sex couples were not void for vagueness where she was not being disciplined for her expression of her religious beliefs, but for her conduct in refusing to impartially perform her judicial functions, and an ordinary judge would have understood that refusal to conduct some marriages on the basis of the sexual orientation of the couple did not comply with the Code of Judicial Conduct. Neely v. Wyo. Comm'n on Judicial Conduct & Ethics, 2017 WY 25, 390 P.3d 728,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2017), cert. denied, 138 S. Ct. 639, 199 L. Ed. 2d 527, 2018 U.S. LEXIS 103 (U.S. 2018).

No federal civil rights damage claim for violation. —

This section provides only that the right to free speech and press shall be subject to a potential cause of action for libel. It creates no property interest in being free from libel, such as to support a federal civil rights claim for damages. Coen v. Runner, 854 F.2d 374, 1988 U.S. App. LEXIS 11229 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1988).

Terrorist threat statute doesn't reach protected speech. —

A statute may be challenged “facially” for vagueness only if it reaches a substantial amount of constitutionally protected conduct. Section 6-2-505(a) (terrorist threats) does not reach a substantial amount of constitutionally protected speech, such as “practical jokes and groundless threats.” Clearly, what the legislature intended to prohibit through § 6-2-505(a) were violent threats which subject society to clear and present dangers. McCone v. State, 866 P.2d 740,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. Feb. 2, 1994).

“With good intent and [for] justifiable ends.” —

The language “with good intent and [for] justifiable ends” means that the matter must be published with a good purpose and for a defensible ultimate object, and these are facts to be proven as any other fact of like nature in a litigated case. Spriggs v. Cheyenne Newspapers, 63 Wyo. 416, 182 P.2d 801,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1947).

The phrase “when published with good intent and [for] justifiable ends” of this section is repugnant to the guarantees of the First Amendment of the United States Constitution in libel actions in which the New York Times Co. v. Sullivan, 376 U.S. 254, 11 L. Ed. 2d 686, 84 S. Ct. 710, 1964 U.S. LEXIS 1655, 95 A.L.R.2d 1412 (1964) and Curtis Publishing Co. v. Butts, 388 U.S. 130, 18 L. Ed. 2d 1094, 87 S. Ct. 1975, 1967 U.S. LEXIS 1084 (1967) standard applies to public figures who have been criticized by a media defendant regarding matters of public concern. Dworkin v. L.F.P., Inc., 839 P.2d 903,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 1992).

Statute establishing qualification for newspapers entitled to publish legal notices upheld. —

Former statute, providing that a newspaper having the right to publish notices with legal effect must have been established for one year or more, was not in conflict with the provisions for freedom of the press and therefore not unconstitutional. In re Gillette Daily Journal, 44 Wyo. 226, 11 P.2d 265,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1932).

Publisher's free speech rights outweigh litter prohibition. —

Publisher of a free weekly newspaper distributed door to door and through news racks did not violate the local littering ordinance as the burden on the town was extraordinarily minor and the burden on private property was trivial. The newspaper, as a noncommercial publication, is entitled to the full protection of the Constitution of the United States and Wyoming. The town may not place a complete ban on speech, a form of prior restraint, if that speech is in a form which may eventually be viewed as litter. Miller v. City of Laramie, 880 P.2d 594,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1994).

Public figures. —

Where an unknown person called in to an open microphone talk show conducted by an employee of a radio broadcasting company, which did not use an electronic delay system in connection with the talk show, and the anonymous caller stated that she wished to read a prepared statement and thereupon said that a public figure “had been discharged as insurance commissioner for dishonesty,” the person named in the statement could not recover for defamation. Adams v. Frontier Broadcasting Co., 555 P.2d 556,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1976).

Lawyer representing famous client not “public figure.” —

A lawyer who is merely advocating for a famous or controversial client is not a public figure merely because he has taken on the cause as advocate. Spence v. Flynt, 816 P.2d 771,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1991), reh'g denied,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. Sept. 16, 1991), cert. denied, 503 U.S. 984, 112 S. Ct. 1668, 118 L. Ed. 2d 388, 1992 U.S. LEXIS 2342 (U.S. 1992).

Contemptuous utterances of attorney directed to supreme court. —

Contemptuous utterances of attorney, consisting of letters and exhibits mailed to the supreme court during the pendency of his petition for permission to practice law in Wyoming and during the pendency of a contempt proceeding in the supreme court, were not justified under the constitutional right of freedom of speech, since such utterances constituted a clear and present danger to the supreme court and the administration of justice, and authorized punishment for contempt. Application of Stone, 77 Wyo. 1, 305 P.2d 777,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 352 U.S. 1026, 77 S. Ct. 593, 1 L. Ed. 2d 598, 1957 U.S. LEXIS 1248 (U.S. 1957), reh'g denied, 353 U.S. 943, 77 S. Ct. 818, 1 L. Ed. 2d 764 (U.S. 1957).

Disbarment proceeding. —

Provision in reference to libel and slander in which jury determines facts and law is not applicable to disbarment proceeding based on charge of circulating pamphlet making false, contemptuous and scandalous charges against supreme court. State Bd. of Law Examiners v. Spriggs, 61 Wyo. 70, 155 P.2d 285,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 325 U.S. 886, 65 S. Ct. 1571, 89 L. Ed. 2001, 1945 U.S. LEXIS 1905 (U.S. 1945).

The publication of information of a disbarment proceeding by a newspaper is in aid of the public welfare and can unquestionably be regarded as done for “a good purpose” and for a “defensible ultimate object.” Spriggs v. Cheyenne Newspapers, 63 Wyo. 416, 182 P.2d 801,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1947).

Picketing. —

If a labor union, because of an employer's refusal to sign an agreement to employ union members only, without contacting employer's employees or discussing with them conditions of their work or the desirability of their joining the union, pickets the employer's premises and in such picketing states that the employer is unfair to the local union, such picketing is not an exercise of the right of free speech as set out in this section. Hagen v. Culinary Workers Alliance Local, 70 Wyo. 165, 246 P.2d 778,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1952).

No policy protecting private employee's speech rights. —

Terminating an at-will employee for exercising his right to free speech by refusing to follow a legal directive of a private employer on the employer's premises during working hours (i.e., refusing to wear anti-union buttons) did not violate public policy. Drake v. Cheyenne Newspapers, 891 P.2d 80,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1995).

A teacher has the right to criticize his or her employers.

Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

And utterances of a teacher in behalf of his union activities were protected

by the United States and Wyoming constitutions. Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976).

Anonymous letter to school supervisors protected speech. —

An anonymous letter sent by certain employees at the Wyoming girls' school to the school's supervisory board members to advise them regarding administrative problems qualified as “whistle-blowing” protected speech in the context and manner in which it was used. Mekss v. Wyoming Girls' Sch., 813 P.2d 185,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1991), reh'g denied, 813 P.2d 185,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1991), cert. denied, 502 U.S. 1032, 112 S. Ct. 872, 116 L. Ed. 2d 777, 1992 U.S. LEXIS 266 (U.S. 1992).

Employee talking in derogatory fashion to employer's customers not protected. —

An employee who talked in a derogatory fashion to the customers and business contacts of his employer was not protected, by virtue of his right to speak freely, from disciplinary action by the employer. Allen v. Safeway Stores, 699 P.2d 277,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 479

(Wyo. 1985), overruled in part, Hoflund v. Airport Golf Club, 2005 WY 17, 105 P.3d 1079,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2005).

Statements at public school by principal on internal affairs of school system,

which were part of the principal's official functions, do not invoke free speech protection. Schmidt v. Fremont County School Dist., 558 F.2d 982, 1977 U.S. App. LEXIS 12285 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1977).

Public school principal failed to meet his burden of showing that his statements made to the board of education on the career education program and football reserved ticket sales were constitutionally protected or the substantial or motivating factor for his termination. Schmidt v. Fremont County School Dist., 558 F.2d 982, 1977 U.S. App. LEXIS 12285 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1977).

Bookkeeper's constitutional right of free speech was not infringed by dismissal from employment

at the Wyoming girls' school, where her actions in making telephone calls to the school superintendent's superior regarding administrative problems did not entitle her to “whistle-blower” status and, in fact, directly impaired the superintendent's authority and ability to discipline the staff. Mekss v. Wyoming Girls' Sch., 813 P.2d 185,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1991), reh'g denied, 813 P.2d 185,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1991), cert. denied, 502 U.S. 1032, 112 S. Ct. 872, 116 L. Ed. 2d 777, 1992 U.S. LEXIS 266 (U.S. 1992).

No protection based on private employee's speech. —

Grant of summary judgment in favor of two employers in the employee's wrongful termination suit was appropriate because her actions in expressing her negative opinion of her employers were not fair and were potentially harmful or hurtful to her employers. The employee's speech under those circumstances exceeded the limits of protected speech.
McGarvey v. Key Prop. Mgmt. LLC, 2009 WY 84, 211 P.3d 503,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 2009).

Political patronage of deputy sheriff. —

Under §

18-3-611

, political patronage and other expressions of the freedom of association and party affiliation are not cause or justification for which a deputy sheriff may be terminated. Lucero v. Mathews, 901 P.2d 1115,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 1995), reh'g denied,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. Sept. 26, 1995).

Right of access to police records may be restrained. —

Constitutional right of the public and the press of access to police records may be conditioned by statutory restrictions and balanced with relevant competing-interest considerations: the legislature has authority to promulgate such statutory restraints upon the news-gathering business as will best serve the public good. Sheridan Newspapers v. Sheridan, 660 P.2d 785,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1983).

Statements deemed defamatory. —

Magazine article statements describing the plaintiff, a practicing attorney, as a “vermin-infested turd dispenser,” a “parasitic scum-sucker,” a “shameless shithole,” a “reeking rectum,” a “hemorrhoidal type” and “Asshole of the Month for July,” were clearly defamatory. Spence v. Flynt, 816 P.2d 771,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1991), reh'g denied,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. Sept. 16, 1991), cert. denied, 503 U.S. 984, 112 S. Ct. 1668, 118 L. Ed. 2d 388, 1992 U.S. LEXIS 2342 (U.S. 1992).

Criminal libel. —

See In re MacDonald, 4 Wyo. 150, 33 P. 18,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1893).

Truth of a defamatory statement is a “complete” defense

to an action for libel. Ando v. Great Western Sugar Co., 475 F.2d 531, 1973 U.S. App. LEXIS 11030 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1973).

Substantially true news articles complete defense to libel charge. —

When it was stated in a news story that a county official refused to step from his vehicle after being arrested for a traffic violation, grasped the steering wheel tightly and resisted the police officers, was forcibly pulled from his vehicle, and wrestled to a position that his hands were forced behind him and put in handcuffs, the damage to his reputation, if damage there was, was complete. It made little difference in the final result whether he was wrestled against the car or “wrestled to the ground,” as reported in an earlier news story. The news articles reporting the incident were, therefore, substantially true as a matter of law and, hence, a complete defense to a libel charge. Tschirgi v. Lander Wyoming State Journal, 706 P.2d 1116,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 568

(Wyo. 1985).

Section does not absolutely guarantee plaintiff trial to jury in defamation case.

Spence v. Flynt, 816 P.2d 771,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1991), reh'g denied,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. Sept. 16, 1991), cert. denied, 503 U.S. 984, 112 S. Ct. 1668, 118 L. Ed. 2d 388, 1992 U.S. LEXIS 2342 (U.S. 1992).

Party not entitled to discuss law before jury. —

In an action of libel the trial court did not err in refusing to allow the plaintiff to discuss before the jury the law of the case including the law relative to punitive damages where the court had set forth the law in instructions to the jury. Spriggs v. Cheyenne Newspapers, 63 Wyo. 416, 182 P.2d 801,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1947).

Instructions to jury. —

Under this section the court may instruct the jury fully upon the law and tell them that they, the jury, did not have the right to decide the case regardless of the law, but that if they could say on their oaths that they knew the law better than the court they might do so, but they should be fully convinced that the court was wrong and that they were right. Nicholson v. State, 24 Wyo. 347, 157 P. 1013,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1916).

Summary judgment may be granted in libel action. —

Despite the statement that the jury shall determine the facts and the law, there is no doubt but that a trial court in a libel action may in a proper case grant a summary judgment. Ando v. Great Western Sugar Co., 475 F.2d 531, 1973 U.S. App. LEXIS 11030 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1973).

This section does not preclude the trial court's use of summary judgment procedure in a defamation action. Dworkin v. L.F.P., Inc., 839 P.2d 903,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 1992).

Inflammatory publicity did not deny defendant fair trial. —

The court did not abuse its discretion in denying a change of venue where the effects of inflammatory publicity on potential jurors were mitigated by a carefully controlled voir dire so as to avoid the denial of a fair trial to the defendant. Armstrong v. State, 826 P.2d 1106,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1992).

Applied

in

Foothill Indus. Bank v. Mikkelson, 623 P.2d 748,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 286

(Wyo. 1981).

Cited

in

Williams v. Eaton, 310 F. Supp. 1342, 1970 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12370 (D. Wyo. 1970); Cranston v. Thomson, 530 P.2d 726,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1975); Hoem v. State, 756 P.2d 780,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1988); Robinson v. Pacificorp, 10 P.3d 1133,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 2000).

Law reviews. —

For note, “Truthful Libel and Right of Privacy in Wyoming,” see XI Wyo. L.J. 184.

For comment on Adams v. Frontier Broadcasting Co., 555 P.2d 556,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1976), see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 749 (1977).

For case note, “Constitutional Law — A Constitutional Right of Access to State-Held Information. Sheridan Newspapers, Inc. v. City of Sheridan, 660 P.2d 785,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 719 (1984).

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).

For case note, “Lawyer Advertising and Solicitation — Justifying Restrictions on Lawyers' Speech. Florida Bar v. Went For It, Inc., 155 S. Ct. 2371 (1995),” see XXXI Land & Water 231 (1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of state or local regulation prohibiting off-premises advertising structures, 81 ALR3d 486.

Validity and construction of state or local regulation prohibiting the erection or maintenance of advertising structures within a specified distance of street or highway, 81 ALR3d 564.

Libel by newspaper headline, 95 ALR3d 660.

Liability for defamation for criticizing restaurant's food, 96 ALR3d 609.

Privilege of newsgatherer against disclosure of confidential sources or information, 99 ALR3d 37.

Validity and construction of statutes or ordinances prohibiting profanity or profane swearing or cursing, 5 ALR4th 956.

Validity and construction of statutes or ordinances prohibiting or restricting distribution of commercial advertising to private residences — modern cases, 12 ALR4th 851.

Validity of law criminalizing wearing dress of opposite sex, 12 ALR4th 1249.

Validity, propriety, and effect of allowing or prohibiting media's broadcasting, recording, or photographing court proceedings, 14 ALR4th 121.

Right of jailed or imprisoned parent to visit from minor child, 15 ALR4th 1234.

Liability for personal injury or death allegedly resulting from television or radio broadcast, 20 ALR4th 327.

Validity, construction, and effect of statutes, ordinances, or regulations prohibiting or regulating advertising of intoxicating liquors, 20 ALR4th 600.

Libel and slander: attorneys' statements, to parties other than alleged defamed party or its agents, in course of extrajudicial investigation or preparation relating to pending or anticipated civil litigation as privileged, 23 ALR4th 932.

Defamation: loss of employer's qualified privilege to publish employee's work record or qualification, 24 ALR4th 144.

Advertising as ground for disciplining attorney, 30 ALR4th 742.

State constitutional protection of allegedly defamatory statements regarding private individual, 33 ALR4th 212.

Validity of state judicial or bar association rule forbidding use of law firm name unless it contains exclusively names of persons who are or were members of that state's bar, as it applies to out-of-state law firm, 33 ALR4th 404.

Libel and slander: privileged nature of statements or utterances by members of governing body of public institution of higher learning in course of official proceedings, 33 ALR4th 632.

Proof of injury to reputation as prerequisite to recovery of damages in defamation action — post-Gertz cases, 36 ALR4th 807.

Propriety of order forbidding news media from publishing names and addresses of jurors in criminal cases, 36 ALR4th 1126.

Libel and slander: necessity of expert testimony to establish negligence of media defendant in defamation action by private individual, 37 ALR4th 987.

Criticism or disparagement of character, competence or conduct of candidate for office as defamation, 37 ALR4th 1088.

Right of member of nonprofit association or corporation to possession, inspection or use of membership list, 37 ALR4th 1206.

Criticism or disparagement of physician's or dentist's character, competence or conduct as defamation, 38 ALR4th 836.

Defamation of psychiatrist, psychologist or counselor, 38 ALR4th 874.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance regulating commercial video game enterprises, 38 ALR4th 930.

Defamation: application of New York Times and related standards to nonmedia defendants, 38 ALR4th 1114.

Validity, under state constitutions, of private shopping center's prohibition or regulation of political, social or religious expression or activity, 38 ALR4th 1219.

Validity of college or university regulation of political or voter registration activity in student housing facilities, 39 ALR4th 1137.

Use of compulsory bar association dues or fees for activities from which particular members dissent, 40 ALR4th 672.

State or local sales, use or privilege tax on sales of, or revenues from sales of, advertising space or services, 40 ALR4th 1114.

What constitutes “single publication” within meaning of single publication rule affecting action for libel and slander, violation of privacy or similar torts, 41 ALR4th 541.

Trespass: state prosecution for unauthorized entry or occupation, for public demonstration purposes, of business, industrial or utility premises, 41 ALR4th 773.

Defamation: nature and extent of privilege accorded public statements, relating to subject of legislative business or concern, made by member of state or local legislature or council outside of formal proceedings, 41 ALR4th 1116.

Validity and construction of terroristic threat statutes, 45 ALR4th 949.

Criticism or disparagement of attorney's character, competence or conduct as defamation, 46 ALR4th 326.

Defamation by gestures or acts, 46 ALR4th 403.

Rights of state and municipal public employees in grievance proceedings, 46 ALR4th 912.

Defamation: publication by intracorporate communication of employee's evaluation, 47 ALR4th 674.

Defamation: privilege attaching to news report of criminal activities based on information supplied by public safety officers — modern status, 47 ALR4th 718.

Excessiveness or inadequacy of compensatory damages for defamation, 49 ALR4th 1158.

Validity, construction and effect of state statutes restricting political activities of public officers or employees, 51 ALR4th 702.

Validity and construction of state court's order precluding publicity or comment about pending civil case by counsel, parties or witnesses, 56 ALR4th 1214.

False light invasion of privacy — cognizability and elements, 57 ALR4th 22.

False light invasion of privacy — defenses and remedies, 57 ALR4th 244.

Imputation of criminal, abnormal, or otherwise offensive sexual attitude or behavior as defamation — post-New York Times cases, 57 ALR4th 404.

Libel or slander: defamation by statement made in jest, 57 ALR4th 520.

Intrusion by news-gathering entity as invasion of right of privacy, 69 ALR4th 1059.

Standing of media representatives or organizations to seek review of, or to intervene to oppose, order closing criminal proceedings to public, 74 ALR4th 476.

Search and seizure of telephone company records pertaining to subscriber as violation of subscriber's constitutional rights, 76 ALR4th 536.

Validity of ordinances restricting location of “adult entertainment” or sex-oriented businesses, 10 ALR5th 538.

Validity and construction of statutes prohibiting harassment of hunters, fishermen or trappers, 17 ALR5th 837.

Who is “public figure” for purposes of defamation action, 19 ALR5th 1.

Validity, construction, and effect of “hate crimes” statutes, “ethnic intimidation” statutes, or the like, 22 ALR5th 261.

Propriety of exclusion of press or other media representatives from civil trial, 39 ALR5th 103.

Propriety of publishing identity of sexual assault victim, 40 ALR5th 787.

Who is “public official” for purposes of defamation action, 44 ALR5th 193.

Validity, under state constitutions, of private shopping center's prohibition or regulation of political, social, or religious expression or activity, 52 ALR5th 195.

Admissibility of evidence of public opinion polls or surveys in obscenity prosecutions on issue whether materials in question are obscene, 59 ALR5th 749.

Reportorial privilege as to nonconfidential news information, 60 ALR5th 75.

First Amendment protection afforded to commercial and home video games, 106 ALR5th 337.

First amendment challenges to display of religious symbols on public property, 107 ALR5th 1.

First Amendment protection afforded to comic books, comic strips, and cartoons,118 ALR 5th 213.

School district rules limiting distribution of literature or other communications among public school teachers as violative of first amendment, 65 ALR Fed 209.

Access of public to broadcast facilities under first amendment, 66 ALR Fed 628.

Requirement that agent of foreign principal register with United States attorney general, under provisions of Foreign Agents Registration Act of 1938, as amended (22 USC § 611 et seq.), 67 ALR Fed 774.

Propriety of federal court's exclusion of public from criminal or civil trial in order to protect trade secrets, 69 ALR Fed 892.

Dismissal of, or other adverse personnel action relating to, public employee for political patronage reasons as violative of first amendment, 70 ALR Fed 371.

Parody as copyright infringement or fair use under Federal Copyright Act (17 USC § 101 et seq.), 75 ALR Fed 822.

What oral statement of student is sufficiently disruptive so as to fall beyond protections of first amendment, 76 ALR Fed 599.

Constitutionality of teaching or suppressing teaching of Biblical creationism or Darwinian evolution theory in public schools, 102 ALR Fed 537.

Constitutionality of teaching or otherwise promoting secular humanism in public schools, 103 ALR Fed 538.

First Amendment protection for law enforcement employees subjected to discharge, transfer, or discipline because of speech, 109 ALR Fed 9.

Right of access to federal district court guilty plea proceeding or records pertaining to entry or acceptance of guilty plea in criminal prosecution, 118 ALR Fed 621.

Construction of Freedom of Speech and Assembly Provisions of § 101(a)(2) of Labor—Management Reporting and Disclosure Act of 1959 (29 USCS § 411(a)(2)), Included in Bill of Rights of Member of Labor Organization. 143 ALR Fed 1.

Protection of commercial speech under first amendment — Supreme Court cases, 164 ALR Fed 1.

Construction and application of federal and state constitutional and statutory speech or debate provisions. 24 A.L.R.6th 255.

§ 21. Right of petition and peaceable assembly.

The right of petition, and of the people peaceably to assemble to consult for the common good, and to make known their opinions, shall never be denied or abridged.

Cross references. —

For offense and punishment of breach of the peace, see §

6-6-102

.

For provision that article defining and punishing unlawful conduct within governmental facilities does not abridge freedom of assembly, see §

6-6-304

.

As to regulation of the assemblage of large numbers of people, see §§

35-15-101

to

35-15-112

.

Right of petition not to be curtailed. —

Neither state nor federal officials — whether executive, legislative or judicial — may assume the power to deny or curtail the right of the people to petition the governing authority involved relative to matters connected with its powers and duties. Spriggs v. Clark, 45 Wyo. 62, 14 P.2d 667,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1932).

Picketing. —

If a labor union, because of an employer's refusal to sign an agreement to employ union members only, without contacting employer's employees or discussing with them conditions of their work or the desirability of their joining the union, pickets the employer's premises and in such picketing states that the employer is unfair to the local union, such picketing is not an exercise of the right of peaceable assembly as set out in this section. Hagen v. Culinary Workers Alliance
Local 337, Hagen v. Culinary Workers Alliance Local, 70 Wyo. 165, 246 P.2d 778,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1952).

Cited

in

State v. Smart, 22 Wyo. 154, 136 P. 452,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(1913); Williams v. Eaton, 310 F. Supp. 1342, 1970 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12370 (D. Wyo. 1970); Cranston v. Thomson, 530 P.2d 726,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1975).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Action under 42 USC § 1985(1) for conspiracy to defame or otherwise harm the reputation of federal official, 69 ALR Fed 913.

“Sham” exception to application of Noerr-Pennington doctrine, exempting from federal antitrust laws joint efforts to influence governmental action, 71 ALR Fed 723.

§ 22. Protection of labor.

The rights of labor shall have just protection through laws calculated to secure to the laborer proper rewards for his service and to promote the industrial welfare of the state.

Cross references. —

For other provisions as to protection of labor, see art. 19, §§ 2 to 4 and 7, Wyo. Const.

As to labor and employment generally, see title 27.

Statute regulating the hours of labor on public works

does not violate this section. State v. A. H. Read Co., 33 Wyo. 387, 240 P. 208,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1925).

Quoted

in

Bebber v. Mills Lumber Co., 429 P.2d 92,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 1967).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Exclusivity Provisions of the Worker's Compensation Act as a Bar to Third-Party Actions Against Employers. Pan American Petroleum Corp. v. Maddux Well Service, 586 P.2d 1220,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 244

(Wyo. 1978),” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 587 (1979).

For case note, “Worker's Compensation — The Dilemma of Co-Employee Immunity and the Confusion in the Aftermath of Mills II. Mills v. Reynolds, 837 P.2d 48,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 271 (1993).

§ 23. Education.

The right of the citizens to opportunities for education should have practical recognition. The legislature shall suitably encourage means and agencies calculated to advance the sciences and liberal arts.

Cross references. —

See also art. 7, §§ 1 to 17, Wyo. Const., and title 21.

Educational services may be suspended where conduct threatens safety and welfare of others. —

A student may temporarily have his educational services suspended if his conduct threatens the safety and welfare of other students and school employees and thereby interferes with the school district's obligation to provide an equal opportunity for a quality education to all the students of that district. RM v. Washakie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 2004 WY 162, 102 P.3d 868,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(Wyo. 2004).

Alternative not required where students expelled for selling marijuana. —

Where two students were expelled for one year for selling marijuana, the state constitution did not require that the school district had to provide them with an alternate education because they had been lawfully expelled, the district's actions were the least onerous means of accomplishing its compelling interest in providing for the safety and welfare of its students, and the students had not been denied all educational opportunity as they could have chosen to return to school after their suspensions. RM v. Washakie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 2004 WY 162, 102 P.3d 868,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(Wyo. 2004).

No educational services past age 21. —

A county school district is neither entitled nor obligated to provide educational services for individuals within the district after a recipient reaches his or her twenty-first birthday. Natrona County Sch. Dist. v. Ryan, 764 P.2d 1019,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1988).

Quoted

in

State ex rel. R.R. Crow & Co. v. Copenhaver, 64 Wyo. 1, 184 P.2d 594,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(1947); Erickson v. School Dist., 67 Wyo. 216, 217 P.2d 887,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1950); Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1980); Simons v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 741 P.2d 1116,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1987).

Stated

in

Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. State, 907 P.2d 1238,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1995).

Law reviews. —

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

For comment, “Education for Handicapped Children in Wyoming: What Constitutes a Free Appropriate Public Education and Other Administrative Hurdles,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 225 (1984).

For case note, “EDUCATIONAL LAW — Wyoming Refuses to Recognize Compensatory Education as a Remedy Under the Education for All Handicapped Children Act of 1975. Natrona County School Dist. No. 1 v. McKnight, 764 P.2d 1039,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1988),” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 529 (1989).

For case note, “Real Property — Wyoming's Private Road Statutes: Approaching a Dead End? Lindt v. Murray, 895 P.2d 459,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 1995),” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 443 (1996).

For article, “Financing Wyoming's Public Schools: The Wyoming Legislature Gets to Try Again,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 469 (1996).

§ 24. Right to bear arms.

The right
of citizens to bear arms in defense of themselves and of the state
shall not be denied.

Cited in

Starrett v. State, 2013 WY 133,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 139

, 286 P.3d 1033 (2012).

Cross references. —

As to state militia, see art. 17, §§ 1 to 5, Wyo. Const.

As to weapons offenses and firearms regulations, see §§

6-8-101

to

6-8-103

.

As to advisement of loss of firearms rights upon conviction,
see §

7-11-507

As to the attorney general's protection of the constitutional right of citizens to bear arms, see §

9-14-101

.

Former § 6-11-115 deemed legitimate exercise of state police power. —

Former § 6-11-115, which prevented certain people from possessing firearms, was a legitimate exercise of the police power of the state and was not unreasonable. Carfield v. State, 649 P.2d 865,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 373

(Wyo. 1982). See §

6-8-102

.

No constitutional right to carry a concealed weapon. —

Where applicant for a gun permit contended he had a fundamental right to own a firearm, guaranteed by the Wyoming Constitution, and that he was, therefore, entitled to a hearing, the Supreme Court of Wyoming held that there was no constitutional right to carry a concealed weapon and, just as one may not drive an automobile without a license, one may not carry a concealed weapon without a permit. King v. Wyo. Div. of Crim. Investigation, 2004 WY 52, 89 P.3d 341,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2004).

Section 6-8-104(a), which proscribes carrying of concealed deadly weapons, is not unconstitutional infringement

upon the right of citizens to bear arms in defense of themselves.
State v. McAdams, 714 P.2d 1236,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 658

(Wyo. 1986).

A permit to carry a firearm is a “privilege” and not a “right”.

Mecikalski v. Office of the AG, 2 P.3d 1039,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 2000).

Cited

in

State v. Smart, 22 Wyo. 154, 136 P. 452,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(1913).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of state statutes restricting the right of aliens to bear arms, 28 ALR4th 1096.

Validity of state statute proscribing possession or carrying of knife, 47 ALR4th 651.

Validity of state gun control legislation under state constitutional provisions securing the right to bear arms, 86 ALR4th 931.

Validity, construction and application of state or local law prohibiting manufacture, possession or transfer of “assault weapon,” 29 ALR5th 664.

What constitutes actual or constructive possession of unregistered or otherwise prohibited firearm in violation of 26 USC § 5861, 133 ALR Fed 347.

§ 25. Military subordinate to civil power; quartering soldiers.

The military shall ever be in strict subordination to the civil power. No soldier in time of peace shall be quartered in any house without consent of the owner, nor in time of war except in the manner prescribed by law.

Cross references. —

As to state militia, see art. 17, §§ 1 to 5, Wyo. Const.

As to defense forces and affairs generally, see title 19.

§ 26. Treason.

Treason against the state shall consist only in levying war against it, or in adhering to its enemies, or in giving them aid and comfort. No person shall be convicted of treason unless on the testimony of two witnesses to the same overt act, or on confession in open court; nor shall any person be attained of treason by the legislature.

Cross references. —

For provision that the governor cannot pardon person convicted of treason, see art. 4, § 5, Wyo. Const.

§ 27. Elections free and equal.

Elections shall be open, free and equal, and no power, civil or military, shall at any time interfere to prevent an untrammeled exercise of the right of suffrage.

Cross references. —

For other provisions concerning suffrage and elections, see art. 6, §§ 1 to 22, Wyo. Const., and title 22.

Right to vote is a fundamental right

entitled to the strict protection of the courts. Brimmer v. Thomson, 521 P.2d 574,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1974).

Election on proposed bond issue. —

Statute providing for school district elections on proposed bond issues in which property and nonproperty owners could vote was not in conflict with constitutional requirements of free elections and equality. State ex rel. Voiles v. Johnson County High Sch., 43 Wyo. 494, 5 P.2d 255,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1931).

Local elections. —

Section

15-11-105

is unambiguous, its intended meaning is readily apparent, it does not violate this provision, nor does it violate the Equal Protection Clause of the Fourteenth Amendment to the U.S. Constitution.Shumway v. Worthey, 2001 WY 130, 37 P.3d 361,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 2001).

Quoted

in

Gorin v. Karpan, 775 F. Supp. 1430, 1991 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14885 (D. Wyo. 1991).

Cited

in

Cranston v. Thomson, 530 P.2d 726,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1975).

§ 28. Taxation; consent of people; uniformity and equality.

No tax shall be imposed without the consent of the people or their authorized representatives. (As amended by Laws 1988, Senate Joint Resolution No. 7; p. 283.)

Cross references. —

As to taxation and revenue generally, see art. 15, §§ 1 to 19, Wyo. Const.

As to license tax in connection with professions and occupations, see title 33.

As to taxation generally, see title 39.

Editor's notes. —

Despite the change in subject matter, the catchline for this section was not changed following the 1988 amendment.

Quoted

in

Black v. Teton County Bd. of County Comm'rs, 775 P.2d 484,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1989).

Cited

in

State v. Campbell County Sch. Dist., 2001 WY 19, 19 P.3d 518,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2001); RM v. Washakie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 2004 WY 162, 102 P.3d 868,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(2004).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Remedies for Defects in General Property Tax Assessments in Wyoming,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 240.

For article, “Gross Products Tax,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 250.

For article, “An Analysis of Recent Tax Proposals in Wyoming,” see III Land & Water L. Rev. 479 (1968).

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).